Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2013.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 310(c)(6)(i)(E) of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, is amended to read:Section 310. Unlawful acts by manufacturers or distributors.* * *(c) Restriction on ownership of dealer.--* * *(6) The following shall apply:(i) A manufacturer or distributor may own, operate or control not more than five new vehicle dealerships trading solely in electric vehicles, as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), that are not 12345678910111213141516171819 sold as new vehicles by a licensed independent new vehicle dealer pursuant to an existing franchise with a manufacturer or distributor, if each of the following conditions are met:* * *[(E) The manufacturer shall have continuously offered electric vehicles for sale for a period of not less than 12 months prior to the effective date of this clause.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2013PN2567 - 2 - 1234567891011